apertium-lit.lit.dix
      <e><p><l>juos</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>jais</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>juose</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>jos</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>jų</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>joms</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>jas</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>jomis</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>jose</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
      
    <pardef n="t/as__prn">
      <e><p><l>as</l><r>as<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>o</l><r>as<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>am</l><r>as<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ą</l><r>as<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uo</l><r>as<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ame</l><r>as<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ie</l><r>as<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ų</l><r>as<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iems</l><r>as<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uos</l><r>as<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ais</l><r>as<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uose</l><r>as<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>as<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>os</l><r>as<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ai</l><r>as<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ą</l><r>as<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>as<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oje</l><r>as<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>os</l><r>as<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ų</l><r>as<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oms</l><r>as<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>as</l><r>as<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>omis</l><r>as<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ose</l><r>as<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
      
    <pardef n="Lietuv/a__np">
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>os</l><r>a<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ai</l><r>a<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ą</l><r>a<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oje</l><r>a<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <!-- male/female -->     
    <pardef n="lietuv/is__n">
      <e><p><l>io</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iui</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>į</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yje</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>i</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iu</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>is</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ių</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iams</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ius</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iuose</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iai</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iais</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iai</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ės</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ei</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ę</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ėje</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ė</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ių</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ėms</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>es</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ėse</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ės</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ėmis</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ės</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     

    <e lm="tas"><i>t</i><par n="t/as__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="Lietuva"><i>Lietuv</i><par n="Lietuv/a__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Airija"><i>Airij</i><par n="Lietuv/a__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Albanija"><i>Albanij</i><par n="Lietuv/a__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Australija"><i>Australij</i><par n="Lietuv/a__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Bulgarija"><i>Bulgarij</i><par n="Lietuv/a__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Švedija"><i>Švedij</i><par n="Lietuv/a__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Suomija"><i>Suomij</i><par n="Lietuv/a__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Čekija"><i>Čekij</i><par n="Lietuv/a__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Lenkija"><i>Lenkij</i><par n="Lietuv/a__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Slovakija"><i>Slovakij</i><par n="Lietuv/a__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Lietuvos Respublika"><i>Lietuvos<b/>Respublik</i><par n="Lietuv/a__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Lenkijos Respublika"><i>Lenkijos<b/>Respublik</i><par n="Lietuv/a__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Airijos Respublika"><i>Airijos<b/>Respublik</i><par n="Lietuv/a__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Čekijos Respublika"><i>Čekijos<b/>Respublik</i><par n="Lietuv/a__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Europos Sąjunga"><i>Europos<b/>Sąjung</i><par n="Lietuv/a__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Sovietų Sąjunga"><i>Sovietų<b/>Sąjung</i><par n="Lietuv/a__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Tarybų Sąjunga"><i>Tarybų<b/>Sąjung</i><par n="Lietuv/a__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Tarybų Socialistinių Respublikų Sąjunga"><i>Tarybų<b/>Socialistinių<b/>Respublikų<b/>Sąjung</i><par n="Lietuv/a__np"/></e>
    <e lm="lietuvis"><i>lietuv</i><par n="lietuv/is__n"/></e>
    <e lm="australietis"><i>australiet</i><par n="lietuv/is__n"/></e>
    <e lm="albanietis"><i>albaniet</i><par n="lietuv/is__n"/></e>
    <e lm="afrikietis"><i>afrikiet</i><par n="lietuv/is__n"/></e>
